en: Chocolate Sculptures, Chocolate Scupltures
de: Schokoladenfiguren
fr: Sculptures en chocolat
hr: Čokoladne skulpture
it: Sculture di Cioccolato
lt: Šokoladinės skulptūros
nl: Chocoladevormen

en: Chocolate Santa Clauses
de: Schokoladenweihnachtsmänner
fi: Suklaajoulupukit
fr: Pères Noël en chocolat
hr: Čokoladni djedovi Božićnjaci
ja: サンタクロース型のチョコレート
lt: Šokoladiniai Kalėdų Seneliai
nl: Chocolade kerstman

en: Chocolate dinosaurs
de: Schokoladen-Dinosaurier
fr: Dinosaures en chocolat, dinosaure en chocolat, dinosaures de pâques, dinosaure de pâques
hr: Čokoladni dinosauri
ja: 恐竜型のチョコレート
lt: Šokoladiniai dinozaurai
nl: Chocolade dinosauriërs

en: Candy chocolate bars, Bars covered with chocolate
bg: Шоколадови барове
ca: Barretes de xocolata
de: Schokoriegel, Schokoladenriegel
es: Barritas de chocolate
fi: Suklaapatukat
fr: Barres chocolatées, barres au chocolat, Barre chocolatée non biscuitée enrobée, Barre au chocolat sans biscuit
he: חטיפי שוקולד
hr: čokoladice, čokoladica
hu: Csokoládés szelet, Csoki
it: Barrette di cioccolato
ja: チョコレートバー, チョコバー
lt: Šokoladiniai batonėliai
nl: Chocoladesnackrepen
pl: Batony czekoladowe
pt: Barras de chocolate
ro: Batoane de ciocolată
ru: Шоколадные плитки, плитки шоколада, шоколадная плитка, плитка шоколада
zh: 巧克力棒

en: Candy chocolate bars filled with biscuit, Chocolate biscuity bars
de: Schokoriegel mit Keksfüllung
fi: Keksisuklaapatukat
fr: Barres chocolatées biscuitées
hr: Čokoladni biskvit
it: Barrette di cioccolato con biscotto
lt: Šokoladiniai batonėliai su sausainiais
nl: Chocorepen met biscuit

en: Candy chocolate bars filled with wafer
de: Schokoriegel mit Waffelfüllung
fr: Barres chocolatées aux gaufrettes, Barre chocolatée biscuitée type KitKat, Barre chocolatée biscuitée, Kitkat

en: Candy chocolate bars filled with biscuit and caramel, Caramel chocolate cookie bars
de: Schokoriegel mit Keks- und Karamellfüllung
fr: Barres chocolatées biscuitées au caramel
hr: Čokoladice punjene biskvitom i karamelom
it: Barrette di cioccolato ripiene di biscotto e caramello
lt: Šokoladiniai batonėliai su karamele ir sausainiais
nl: Chocorepen gevuld met koekje en karamel

en: Candy chocolate bars filled with coconut
de: Schokoriegel mit Kokosfüllung
fr: Barres chocolatées à la noix de coco, barre chocolatée à la noix de coco type Bounty, Bounty
nl: Chocorepen met kokosvulling

en: Candy chocolate bars filled with milk and cereals, Chocolate covered bars with milk and cereals, Milky cereal breakfast bar with chocolate fortified with vitamins and minerals, Milky cereal breakfast bar fortified with vitamins and minerals
fr: Barres chocolatées au lait et aux céréales, barre chocolatée au lait et aux céréales type Kinder Country, Kinder Country, barre de céréales au lait et au chocolat

en: Candy chocolate bars filled with caramel and peanuts
de: Schokoriegel mit Karamell- und Erdnussfüllung
fr: Barres chocolatées au caramel et cacahuètes, Barres chocolatées aux fruits oléagineux, barre chocolatée aux fruits oléagineux type Snickers, Snickers

en: Candy chocolate bars filled with caramel, Caramel chocolate bars
de: Schokoriegel mit Karamell, Schokoriegel mit Karamellüberzug, Schokoriegel mit Karamellfüllung
fi: Toffee-suklaapatukat
fr: Barres chocolatées au caramel
hr: Čokoladice punjene karamelom
it: Barrette di cioccolato al caramello
lt: Šokoladiniai batonėliai su karamele
nl: Chococaramelrepen, Chocolade-caramelrepen
pt: Barras de chocolate caramelo

en: Chocolate nuts cookie bars
de: Schokoladenkekse mit Nüssen
fr: Barres chocolatées biscuitées aux noisettes
hr: Čokoladni orasi Keksi
it: Barrette biscottate alle noci e cioccolato
lt: Šokoladiniai batonėliai su riešutais ir sausainiais
nl: Chocorepen met noten en biscuit

en: Candy chocolate bars filled with a dairy cream, Chocolate confectionery with dairy filling, Chocolate bar with dairy filling
fr: Barres chocolatées au lait, Confiserie chocolatées au lait, Barre chocolatée au lait, Barres chocolatées au lait type Kinder Maxi, Kinder Maxi
hr: Čokoladni slatkiši s mliječnim punjenjem
ro: Batoane de ciocolată cu lapte

en: Chocolate snack bar dairy filling
fr: Barre de chocolat au lait frais

en: Chocolate snack bar dairy filling with sponge cake
fr: barre de chocolat au lait frais avec génoise

da: Pålægschokolader, Pålægschokolade
nb: Påleggssjokolader
sv: Påläggschoklader

da: Mørke pålægschokolader, Mørk pålægschokolade
sv: Mörka påläggschoklader

da: Mælkepålægschokolader, Lyse pålægschokolader, Lys pålægschokolade
sv: Ljusa påläggschoklader

en: Chocolate candies
bg: Шоколадови бонбони
ca: Caramels de xocolata
de: Schokoladenkonfekt
es: Dulces de chocolate
fi: suklaamakeiset
fr: Confiseries chocolatées
he: ממתקי שוקולד
hr: Čokoladni bomboni
hu: Csokoládés cukorka
it: Confetti al cioccolato
lt: Šokoladiniai saldainiai
nl: Chocoladesnoep
pl: Cukierki czekoladowe
pt: Bombons de chocolate
ru: Шоколад и шоколадные конфеты
sv: Chokladgodis
th: ลูกอมช็อกโกแลต
zh: 巧克力糖果

en: Chocolate-coated marshmallow treats, Walnut whips
da: Flødebolle, Negerbolle, Negerkys
de: Schokokuss
es: Beso de moza, Beso de Negro
fr: Têtes choco
he: קרמבו
hr: Marshmallow poslastice obložene čokoladom
hu: Négercsók
lt: Šokoladu dengti zefyrų skanėstai
nl: Negerzoenen, Negerinnentetten